Utah statutes.
20A-1-705.   Supplemental judgment after criminal conviction.

(1) (a)  If any person, in a criminal action, is found guilty of any violation of this chapter while a candidate for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, state auditor, state treasurer, or attorney general, the court, after entering the finding of guilt, shall:

(i)  enter a supplemental judgment declaring that person to have forfeited the office; and

(ii)  transmit a transcript of the supplemental judgment to the state auditor.

(b)  Upon issuance of the order, the office is vacant and shall be filled as provided by this chapter.

(2) (a)  If any person, in a similar action, is found guilty of any violation of this chapter committed while a member of the personal campaign committee of any candidate for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, state auditor, state treasurer, or attorney general, the court before which the action is tried shall, immediately after entering the finding of guilt:

(i)  enter a supplemental judgment declaring the candidate to have forfeited the office; and

(ii)  transmit a transcript of the supplemental judgment to the state auditor.

(b)  Upon issuance of the order, the office is vacant and shall be filled as provided by this chapter.

(3)  If any person, in a criminal action, is found guilty of any violation of this chapter, committed while a candidate for the office of state senator or state representative, the court, after entering the finding of guilt, shall transmit a certificate setting forth the finding of guilt to the presiding officer of the legislative body for which the person is a candidate.

